Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.120

Restrictions on management or operation personnel—Restriction on leased premises.

(1) Except in the case of an agricultural fair as authorized under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, no person other than a member of a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization (and their employees) or any other person, association or organization (and their employees) approved by the commission, shall take any part in the management or operation of any gambling activity authorized under this chapter unless approved by the commission. No person who takes any part in the management or operation of any such gambling activity shall take any part in the management or operation of any gambling activity conducted by any other organization or any other branch of the same organization unless approved by the commission. No part of the proceeds of the activity shall inure to the benefit of any person other than the organization conducting such gambling activities or if such gambling activities be for the charitable benefit of any specific persons designated in the application for a license, then only for such specific persons as so designated.

(2) No bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization or any other person, association or organization shall conduct any gambling activity authorized under this chapter in any leased premises if rental for such premises is unreasonable or to be paid, wholly or partly, on the basis of a percentage of the receipts or profits derived from such gambling activity.

[ 1997 c 394 s 3; 1987 c 4 s 40; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 12.]